Massachusetts, session 194th, H3557.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) On or before April 1, 2027, all telephone companies and distribution companies as
defined in chapter 164 of the General Laws shall jointly prepare and file an annual report to the
joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy and the joint committee on
municipalities and regional government. The annual report shall include the following
information as of December 31, 2026: (i) the number of double poles at the beginning and end
of the reporting period; (ii) double pole activity, including all attachments transferred during
2026; (iii) the number of unlicensed commercial and municipal attachments; (iv) the average
number of days between the erection of the second pole and takedown of the original defective
pole when there are no unlicensed attachments on the original pole; and (v) the average number
of days between the erection of the second pole and the takedown of the defective pole when
there is at least 1 unlicensed attachment on the original pole. The companies shall also provide,
in the report, a timeline for projected removal of existing double poles as of December 31, 2026,
and such timeline shall include the projected cost associated with the removal. The companies
of 2

shall also provide a list of communities and municipal electric companies that participate in the
statewide notification system utilized to facilitate the notification process for electronically
alerting attachment owners to transfer and remove equipment attached to double poles. Annual
reports shall also be filed, pursuant to all requirements of this section, in perpetuity thereafter by
April 1 of each calendar year.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary,
the department of public utilities and the department of telecommunications and cable shall
jointly issue a report relative to double poles within the Commonwealth within 90 days following
the passage of this act. The report shall provide an assessment of progress made in reducing the
number of double poles in the commonwealth since the issuance of the reports previously issued
pursuant to Section 239 of Chapter 218 of the Acts of 2016 and through December 31, 2025
relative to reducing the number of double utility poles within the commonwealth.
of 2